North Carolina, session 2025, SB296.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143-128.5. Required use of American-produced iron and steel products.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Governmental entity. – As defined in G.S. 143-128.1B.
(2) Iron or steel product. – Any product made primarily of iron or steel, including,
but not limited to, lined or unlined pipes and fittings; bars and rods; wire, wire
ropes, and link chains; forgings; grating and drainage products; access covers,
hatches, manhole covers, and other castings; hydrants; electric transmission
and distribution poles; tanks; flanges; pipe clamps and restraints; valves;
structural steel and other steel mill products; materials made primarily of iron
and steel within precast concrete; and other construction materials made
primarily of iron or steel.
(3) Manufacturing process. – The application of a process to alter the form or
function of materials or elements of a product in a manner that adds value and
transforms the materials or elements into a new finished product functionally
different from a finished product produced merely from assembling materials
or elements into a product without applying such a process.
(4) Produced in the United States. – With respect to iron and steel, all
manufacturing processes, from initial melting through application of coatings,
occurred in the United States, other than metallurgical processes to refine steel
additives.
(5) Public works project. – An activity paid for with any State-appropriated funds
or State funds administered by a governmental entity which consists of the
construction, maintenance, repair, renovation, remodeling, or improvement of
a building, road, street, sewer, storm drain, water system, site development,
irrigation system, reclamation project, gas or electrical distribution system,
gas or electrical substation, or other facility, project, or portion thereof owned
in whole or in part by any governmental entity.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a governmental entity awarding a
contract for a public works project or for the purchase of materials for a public works project
shall include in the contract a provision requiring that any iron or steel product permanently
*S296-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
incorporated in the project shall be produced in the United States. This subsection does not apply
to any of the following:
(1) A public works project for which the governmental entity administering the
funds for the project or the purchase of materials for the project finds that any
of the following apply:
a. Iron or steel products produced in the United States are not produced
in sufficient quantities, reasonably available, or of satisfactory quality.
b. The use of iron or steel products produced in the United States will
increase the total cost of the project by more than twenty percent
(20%).
c. Complying with this subsection is inconsistent with the public interest.
(2) A public works project that makes minimal use of foreign iron or steel
materials when both of the following apply:
a. The foreign iron or steel materials are incidental or ancillary to the
primary product and are not separately identified in the project
specifications.
b. The cost of the foreign iron or steel materials does not exceed
one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the total contract cost or two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), whichever is greater. For
purposes of this sub-subdivision, the cost of the foreign iron or steel
materials is that shown to be the value of those materials as they are
delivered to the project.
(3) Electrical components, equipment, systems, and appurtenances, including
supports, covers, shielding, and other appurtenances related to an electrical
system, necessary for operation or concealment, except transmission and
distribution poles.
(c) This section shall be applied in a manner consistent with, and may not be construed
to impair, the State's obligations under any international agreement.
(d) This section does not apply to contracts awarded by the Department of Transportation
subject to the Buy America requirements of 23 C.F.R. § 635.410."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to contracts
awarded on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 296-First Edition